Oklahoma, session 2025, SB530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 441 of Title 72, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby authorized the establishment by the Oklahoma
Veterans Commission of a private, not-for-profit, charitable
organization to be known as the “State of Oklahoma Veterans
Foundation”. The Foundation shall be for the purpose of soliciting,
accepting, receiving, holding, investing, managing, utilizing, and
expending contributions of money, real or personal property, and

services, for use in support of the activities, services,
facilities, properties, and programs of the Commission and the
Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs, as they support veterans
who are residents of this state. Such contributions shall be
supplementary to any state funding received by the Department and
shall provide a means to further assist the needs of the veteran
community in this state.
B. The Foundation created pursuant to this act shall not be a
public body and may receive contributions from any public or private
source to carry out the purposes of this act including, but not
limited to, gifts or grants from private individuals, companies,
foundations, corporations, and others in the private and public
sectors.
C. Upon incorporation, the Foundation shall operate exclusively
for charitable and educational purposes and shall secure tax-exempt
status under the appropriate provision of Sections 501(c) and 509(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,
Sections 501(c) and 509(a).
D. The Department shall be authorized to create the board of
the Foundation. The commissioners of the Oklahoma Veterans
Commission shall determine the initial members of the Foundation and
elect the board of directors of the Foundation. No employee of the
Department shall be a voting member of the board of directors of the
Foundation. Any voting member of the board of directors of the
Foundation who may have a financial interest in an action under
consideration by the Foundation shall abstain from voting on any
such matter.
E. No administrator of the Department shall provide any
preferential consideration to a potential resident of a State
Veterans Home in the application or admission process due to any
prior or pledged contribution to the Foundation.
F. The Foundation shall make all of its financial records and
documents including work papers, except for the names of donors and
other privileged or confidential materials, available to auditors
who are performing audits of the Department.
ENR. S. B. NO. 530 Page 2

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 530 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 530 Page 4